Hawaii statutes.
§460J-8 License requirements.
To obtain an operator's license, a person shall fulfill the following
requirements:

(1) File an application as prescribed by the board;

(2) Possess a history of honesty, truthfulness,
financial integrity, and fair dealing;

(3) Be at least eighteen years of age;

(4) Satisfy the board's examination and experience
requirements;

(5) If a partnership, joint venture, corporation, or
sole proprietorship, be under the direct management of a responsible managing
employee or operator with an appropriate license;

(6) Submit satisfactory proof to the board that the
person has obtained workers' compensation insurance or has been authorized to
act as a self-insurer as required by chapter 386 or is excluded from the
requirements of chapter 386;

(7) Submit satisfactory proof to the board that the
person has obtained liability insurance, pursuant to section 460J-25; and

(8) Provide other documentation as required by the
board. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 41, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c
126, §3; am L 1987, c 143, §2; am L 1991, c 16, §7; am L 1993, c 74, §3; am L
1997, c 84, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next